Utah statutes.
9-4-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Bonus payments" means that portion of the bonus payments received by the United States government under the Leasing Act paid to the state under Section 35 of the Leasing Act, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 191, together with any interest that had accrued on those payments.

(2)  "Impact board" means the Permanent Community Impact Fund Board created under Section 9-4-304.

(3)  "Impact fund" means the Permanent Community Impact Fund established by this chapter.

(4)  "Interlocal Agency" means a legal or administrative entity created by a subdivision or combination of subdivisions under the authority of Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

(5)  "Leasing Act" means the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.

(6)  "Subdivision" means a county, city, town, county service area, special service district, special improvement district, water conservancy district, water improvement district, sewer improvement district, housing authority, building authority, school district, or public postsecondary institution organized under the laws of this state.

